Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-567
Class V school district; board of education; officers and employees; selection; terms.

The members of the board of education of a Class V school district, at their regular meeting in January each year, shall elect a president and vice president from their own members, who shall serve for terms of one year or until their successors are elected and qualified. The members of the board of education may also select from outside their own members one superintendent of public schools, one secretary, one treasurer, and such other officers as the board may deem necessary for the administration of the affairs of the school district, at such salary as the board may deem just, and in their discretion they may enter into contracts with such officers for terms of not to exceed three years. The board shall have the power to elect its president and vice president and to select its officers and employees in accordance with rules adopted by the board.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 8, p. 319;

Laws 1905, c. 142, § 1, p. 579;

R.S.1913, § 7016;

C.S.1922, § 6647;

Laws 1929, c. 94, § 5, p. 354;

C.S.1929, § 79-2710;

Laws 1937, c. 182, § 6, p. 718;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-2710;

R.S.1943, § 79-2710;

Laws 1949, c. 271, § 2, p. 888;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 256, p. 777;

Laws 1990, LB 1090, § 18;

Laws 1996, LB 604, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1004;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 320.